Mississippi, session 20251E, HB1.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the Department of Archives and History for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026.......................... ............................................ $ 13,059,583.00. SECTION 2.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the special fund in the State Treasury to the credit of the Department of Archives and History which is comprised of special source funds collected by or otherwise available to the department, for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the department for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026.................................................. ............................................ $ 13,826,906.00. SECTION 3. Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of this act, not more than the following amount of funds, with the exception of the provisions in this section, shall be expended only for Personal Services, which includes Vacancy Funding, for the following authorized number of employment headcount: FUNDING: General Funds:              $   9,868,578.00 Special Funds:              $   2,543,329.00 Total Funds:                $  12,411,907.00 PERSONAL SERVICES: Employee Salaries, Wages, and Fringe Benefits:           $  11,590,570.00 Progressions:               $ 0.00 Vacancy Funding:            $     821,337.00 Total Personal Services:     $  12,411,907.00 AUTHORIZED HEADCOUNT: Permanent:                   155 Time-Limited: 10 As used in this section, the term Personal Services shall mean funds provided under the major object of expenditure category Personal Services for Salaries, Wages, and Fringe Benefits.  Funds in this category shall not be transferred to any other category. It is the intention of the Legislature to ensure compliance with the Variable Compensation Plan, as outlined in Section 25-9-147, Mississippi Code of 1972. Payment from these funds shall be in accordance with the Variable Compensation Plan promulgated by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. It is the Legislatures intention that no employees salary falls below the minimum salary established by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. The State Personnel Board shall determine and publish the projected annual cost of Personal Services based on monthly and year-to-date payroll expenditures in compliance with the provisions of this act. With the funds herein appropriated, it shall be the agencys responsibility to ensure that no single personnel action or combination of personnel actions, when annualized, exceeds the Fiscal Year 2026 appropriation for Personal Services with the exception of escalated funds. Further, it shall be the agencys responsibility to ensure that funds required to be appropriated for Personal Services for Fiscal Year 2027 do not exceed Fiscal Year 2026 funds appropriated for that purpose unless programs or positions are added to the agencys Fiscal Year 2026 budget by the Mississippi Legislature. If, at the time the agency takes any action to change Personal Services, the State Personnel Board determines that the agency has taken or will take an action that would cause the agency to exceed the funds appropriated in this act when annualized for Fiscal Year 2026 or increase the need for Personal Services for Fiscal Year 2027, when annualized, the State Personnel Board shall process no salary actions until such time as the requirements of the provisions of this section are met with the exception of new hires determined to be essential for the agency. When used in this section, Vacancy Funding shall mean funds included in the Total Personal Services amount listed above and designated for approved vacancies in Fiscal Year 2026. These funds are to be utilized to increase the number of filled headcounts that were authorized but unfilled as of the last day of Fiscal Year 2025. If the agency fills additional headcounts after May 1, 2025, until the end of Fiscal Year 2025, the amount of available Vacancy Funding may be proportionally reduced to reflect the updated number of filled headcounts. The agency shall be responsible for ensuring that Vacancy Funding is used to increase headcounts and not for promotions, title changes, in-range salary adjustments, or any other mechanism for increasing salaries for current employees. Any transfers or escalations shall be made in accordance with the terms, conditions, and procedures established by law or allowable under the terms set forth within this act. The State Personnel Board shall not escalate positions without written approval from the Department of Finance and Administration. The Department of Finance and Administration shall not provide written approval to escalate any funds for salaries and/or headcounts without proof of availability of new or additional funds above the appropriated level. Unless specifically noted, all Fiscal Year 2025 escalated headcounts have been accounted for and shall be converted to authorized time-limited headcounts. No general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. None of the funds herein appropriated shall be used in violation of the Internal Revenue Services Publication 15-A relating to the reporting of income paid to contract employees, as interpreted by the Office of the State Auditor. If the agencys total authorized headcount decreases from Fiscal Year 2025 to Fiscal Year 2026, it will be the agencys discretion as to what headcounts are removed. SECTION 4.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Department of Archives and History shall maintain complete accounting and personnel records related to the expenditure of all funds appropriated under this act and that such records shall be in the same format and level of detail as maintained for Fiscal Year 2025.  It is further the intention of the Legislature that the agency's budget request for Fiscal Year 2027 shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in a format and level of detail comparable to the format and level of detail provided during the Fiscal Year 2026 budget request process. SECTION 5.  It is the intent of the Legislature that the Mississippi Department of Archives and History shall charge the maximum amount allowable for services rendered, consistent with the cost of providing such services.  The funds derived from these charges shall be deposited into a special fund account in the State Treasury to the credit of the Mississippi Department of Archives and History. SECTION 6.  It is the intent of the Legislature that no part of the funds herein appropriated shall be required to be used for the payment of rent for the museum and public space in the State Historical Museum, Old Capitol Restoration. SECTION 7.  Of the funds provided in Section 2, Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) is provided to the Department of Archives and History from the Mississippi Landmark Grant Fund in accordance with Section 39-5-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, to help support the preservation of Mississippi Landmark Properties. SECTION 8.  Of the funds provided under the provisions of this act, One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) is provided for the purpose of capital development and maintenance of Beauvoir Shrine, the last home of Jefferson Davis, the only President of the Confederate States of America, subject to approval by the Department of Archives and History.  The expenditure of funds available in this section shall be subject to prior approval by the Department of Archives and History. SECTION 9.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this agency for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 10.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Department of Archives and History for the purpose of supporting the Statewide Oral History Project for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026.......... $ 50,000.00. SECTION 11. It is the intention of the Legislature that the funds herein appropriated shall be expended in compliance with Section 27-104-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, that no state agency shall incur obligations or indebtedness in excess of their appropriation and that the responsible officers, either personally or upon their official bonds, shall be held responsible for actions contrary to this provision. SECTION 12. Of the funds provided in Section 2, Seven Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($750,000.00) is provided from Special Funds in the State Treasury to the credit of the State Treasury fund created in Section 27-19-56.69(8), Mississippi Code of 1972, for the purpose of paying the costs of repair and renovation of the New Capitol, the Old Capitol, the Governor's Mansion, and the War Memorial Building, in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration in a manner consistent with the escalation of funds. SECTION 13.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the Capital Expense Fund not otherwise appropriated for the Department of Archives and History for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Capital Expense Funds, as authorized in HB 1776, 2024 Regular Session to defray expenses of the Department of Archives and History for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026................. $  22,751,705.00. This appropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of funds as allocated herein: (a) De la Pointe-Krebs House............... $ 57,992.00. (b) Repair, renovation, and construction projects undertaken by the Department of Archives and History...................... $ 14,268,419.00. (c) Vicksburg Military Park Interpretive Center.................................... $ 5,997,080.00. (d) Crigler Park Project.................. $ 2,428,214.00. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section, shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2025, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 14.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2, Sixteen Thousand Dollars ($16,000.00), or so much thereof as may be necessary, shall be derived out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Project Poppy Fund, as created in Section 57-1-631, Mississippi Code of 1972, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office and Sixteen Thousand Dollars ($16,000.00), or so much thereof as may be necessary, shall be derived out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Project Atlas Fund, as created in Section 57-1-641, Mississippi Code of 1972, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office. These funds are provided for expediting services needed for Project Poppy and Project Atlas. SECTION 15.  The Mississippi Department of Archives and History is authorized to accept and expend any grant, donation, or contribution from any individual, public, or private organization, or government entity for purposes of defraying the operational costs of the department.  Such grants, donations or contributions shall be received and expended under the rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration in a manner consistent with the escalation of federal funds not to exceed One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00). SECTION 16.  The money herein appropriated shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers, in the manner provided by law. SECTION 17. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2025.